Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 9

Inmate Financial Responsibility
Act of 1998

41-21-901. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Inmate Financial Responsibility Act of 1998.”

Acts 1998, ch. 992, § 2.

41-21-902. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assets” means property, tangible or intangible, real or personal, belonging to or due an inmate or former inmate, including income or payments to the inmate from social security, workers' compensation, veteran's compensation, pension benefits, previously earned salary or wages, bonuses, annuities, retirement benefits, insurance benefits or from any other source whatsoever, but does not include any of the following:

The homestead of the inmate;

Money received by the inmate from the state as settlement of a claim against the department by the inmate;

A money judgment received by the inmate from the state as the result of a civil action in which the department was a named defendant and found to be liable; and

Money saved by the inmate from wages and bonuses paid the inmate while the inmate was confined to a state correctional facility;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of correction or the commissioner's designee;

“Cost of care” means the cost to the department of correction for providing transportation, room, board, clothing, security, medical and other normal living expenses of inmates under the jurisdiction of the department, as determined by the commissioner of correction;

“Department” means the department of correction;

“Inmate” means any person who is confined in a correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the department;

“State” means the state of Tennessee; and

“State correctional facility” means a facility or institution that houses an inmate population under the jurisdiction of the department.

Acts 1998, ch. 992, § 3.

41-21-903. Inmate asset disclosure form.

The department shall develop a form to be used by the department to obtain information from inmates regarding assets of the inmates.

Upon being developed, the form shall be submitted to each person who is an inmate as of June 28, 2010, and to any person who thereafter is sentenced to imprisonment under the jurisdiction of the department. The form shall be periodically resubmitted to an inmate by the department for purposes of obtaining current information regarding assets of the inmate. The department shall establish through rule the frequency with which such form shall be resubmitted.

Every inmate who is given a form by the department shall complete the form or provide for completion of the form, and the inmate shall swear or affirm under oath that to the best of the inmate's knowledge the information provided is complete and accurate.

Acts 1998, ch. 992, § 4; 2010, ch. 1113, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (d), concerning the deadline for development of the inmate asset disclosure form, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2006.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1113, § 8 provided that any claimant may promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of the act relating to internal procedures for reporting debts and conducting administrative hearings. The department of revenue may promulgate such other rules to carry out the remaining provisions of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 1113, § 9 provided that the act, which amended subsection (b), shall apply to any claim for refund filed with the department of revenue on or after July 1, 2009, that has not been finally determined.

41-21-904. Inmate asset report.

The department shall develop a report on each inmate who is required to complete a form in accordance with § 41-21-903, together with all other information available on the assets of the inmate and an estimate of the total cost of care for that inmate.

Acts 1998, ch. 992, § 5.

41-21-905. Investigation of inmates' assets — Action for reimbursement of costs of incarceration.

The department shall investigate or cause to be investigated each report furnished pursuant to § 41-21-904.

If the department, upon completing the investigation, has good cause to believe that an inmate has sufficient assets to recover not less than ten percent (10%) of the estimated cost of the inmate for two (2) years or ten percent (10%) of the cost of care of the inmate, whichever is less, the commissioner shall forward reports concerning those inmates to the attorney general and reporter for appropriate action. The attorney general and reporter shall seek to secure reimbursement for the expense to the state of Tennessee for the cost of care of that inmate.

Not more than ninety percent (90%) of the value of the assets of the inmate may be used for purposes of securing costs and reimbursement under this part.

Acts 1998, ch. 992, § 6.

41-21-906. Inmates required to cooperate — Lack of cooperation consideration in parole determination.

An inmate shall fully cooperate with the state by providing complete financial information for purposes under this part.

The failure of an inmate to fully cooperate as provided in subsection (a) may be considered by the board of parole for purposes of a parole determination.

Acts 1998, ch. 992, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 1 amended § 4-3-104, which concerns name changes of departments and divisions, to provide that references to the board of probation and parole, formerly referred to in this section, are deemed references to the board of parole.

41-21-907. Jurisdiction — Form of complaint — Hearing — Order — Amount of reimbursement — Failure to comply — Payment of costs — Recovery of expenses in care of inmate.

The circuit court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over all proceedings under this part. The attorney general and reporter may file a complaint in the circuit court of the county from which an inmate was sentenced, stating that the person is or has been an inmate in a state correctional facility, that there is good cause to believe that the inmate has assets and petition that the assets be used to reimburse the state for the expenses incurred or to be incurred, or both, by the state for the costs of care of the person as an inmate.

Upon the filing of the complaint under subsection (a), the court shall issue an order to show cause why the petition should not be granted. The complaint and order shall be served upon the inmate personally or, if the inmate is confined in a state correctional facility, by registered mail addressed to the inmate in care of the chief administrator of the state correctional facility where the inmate is housed at least thirty (30) days before the date of hearing on the complaint and order.

At the time of the hearing on the complaint and order, if it appears that the inmate has any assets that ought to be subjected to the claim of the state under this part, the court shall issue an order requiring any person, corporation or other legal entity possessing or having custody of those assets to appropriate and apply the assets or a portion of the assets toward reimbursing the state as provided for under this part. The reimbursement is subject to payments for court-ordered child support and arrearages before the state may apply any amounts recovered for reimbursement of its expenses, including the costs of any investigations.

The amount of reimbursement under this part shall not be in excess of the per diem cost of care for maintaining inmates in the state correctional facility in which the inmate is housed.

At the hearing on the complaint and order and before entering any order on behalf of the state against the defendant, the court shall take into consideration any legal obligation of the defendant to support a spouse, minor children or other dependants, and any moral obligation to support dependants to whom the defendant is providing or has in fact provided support. At the hearing the inmate shall have the opportunity to put on proof to show why such an order should not be entered or the existence of appropriate obligations that should limit application of the order.

If the person, corporation or other legal entity neglects or refuses to comply with an order under subsection (c), the court shall order the person, corporation or other legal entity to appear before the court at such time as the court directs and to show cause why the person, corporation or other legal entity should not be considered in contempt of court.

If, in the opinion of the court, the assets of the inmate are sufficient to pay the cost of the proceedings under this part, the assets shall be liable for those costs upon order of the court.

The state may recover the expenses incurred or to be incurred, or both, by the state for the cost of care of the inmate during the entire period or periods the person is an inmate in a state correctional facility.

Acts 1998, ch. 992, § 8.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

41-21-908. Use of remedies, interim orders and enforcement procedures allowed by law or court rule — Liens and other encumbrances — Appointment of receiver — Homestead exemption.

Except as provided in subsection (c), in seeking to secure reimbursement under this part, the attorney general and reporter may use any remedy, interim order, or enforcement procedure allowed by law or court rule, excluding an ex parte restraining order to restrain the inmate or any other person or legal entity in possession or having custody of the estate of the inmate from disposing of certain property, pending a hearing or an order to show cause why the particular property should not be applied to reimburse the state as provided for under this part.

With respect to any lien or similar interest or encumbrance upon real property that is asserted under this section, that lien or similar interest or encumbrance shall be effective only when the party claiming the benefit of it causes a notice thereof to be filed in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the property lies and that lien or similar interest or encumbrance shall be second to liens of the state, county and municipality for taxes, any lien of the county for special assessments and any valid lien, right or interest in the property duly recorded or duly perfected by filing prior to the filing of the notice. The notice shall identify the owner of record of the real property, contain the property address, describe the property sufficiently to identify it and recite the amount of the obligation secured by the lien.

To protect and maintain assets pending resolution of an action under this part, the court, upon request, may appoint a receiver.

The attorney general and reporter or a prosecuting attorney shall not enforce any judgment obtained under this part by means of execution against the homestead of the inmate. The attorney general and reporter shall enforce this part, except that the attorney general and reporter may request the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the inmate was sentenced or the prosecuting attorney of the county in which any asset of an inmate is located to make an investigation or assist in a legal proceeding under this part.

Acts 1998, ch. 992, § 9.

41-21-909. Cooperation with attorney general and reporter — Costs of investigations — State treasurer to make determinations of amounts due.

The sentencing judge, the sheriff of the county, the warden of the state correctional facility and the state treasurer shall furnish to the attorney general and reporter or prosecuting attorney all information and assistance possible to enable the attorney general and reporter or prosecuting attorney to secure reimbursement for the state under this part.

The costs of any investigations under this part shall be paid from the reimbursements secured under this part and the balance of the reimbursements shall be credited to the general fund of the state to be available for general fund purposes.

The state treasurer may determine the amount due the state in cases under this part and render statements of the amount due, and those sworn statements shall be considered prima facie evidence of the amount due.

Acts 1998, ch. 992, § 10.

41-21-910. Interagency cooperation to ensure child support obligations met.

The department of correction, the attorney general and reporter, district attorneys general, the department of human services, and the department of labor and workforce development shall all cooperate and share information to the extent not prohibited by law concerning assets, workers' compensation settlements, and child support obligations of inmates in order that, to the maximum extent feasible, inmates should satisfy existing child support obligations, including arrearages, before the state receives reimbursement, including the costs of any investigations, pursuant to this part.

Acts 1998, ch. 992, § 12; 1999, ch. 520, § 39.

41-21-911. Assignment of workers' compensation arrearages.

Notwithstanding § 50-6-223(b), a court may assign up to fifty percent (50%) of workers' compensation made by periodic payments to pay an arrearage owed by an inmate who is confined in the custody of the department; provided, that the assignment is administered in accordance with § 50-2-105.

Acts 1998, ch. 992, § 13.